Vermont, session 2025-2026, S43.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 631 is amended to read:
§ 631. GROUP INSURANCE FOR STATE EMPLOYEES; SALARY
DEDUCTIONS FOR INSURANCE, SAVINGS PLANS, AND
CREDIT UNIONS
(a)(1) The Secretary of Administration may contract on behalf of the State
with any insurance company or nonprofit association doing business in this
State to secure the benefits of franchise or group insurance. The terms of
coverage under the policy shall be determined under section 904 of this title,
but it may include:
(A) life, disability, health, and accident insurance and benefits for
any class or classes of State employees; and
(B) hospital, surgical, and medical benefits for any class or classes of
State employees or for those employees and any class or classes of their
dependents.
(2)(A)(i) As used in this section, the term “employees” includes any
class or classes of elected or appointed officials, State’s Attorneys, sheriffs,
employees of State’s Attorneys’ offices whose compensation is administered
through the State of Vermont payroll system, except contractual and temporary
employees, and deputy sheriffs paid by the State of Vermont pursuant to 24
V.S.A. § 290(b). The term “employees” shall does not include members of the
VT LEG #379227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.43
2025 Page 3 of 4
General Assembly as such, any person rendering service on a retainer or fee
basis, members of boards or commissions, or persons other than employees of
the Vermont Historical Society, the Vermont Film Corporation, the Vermont
State Employees’ Credit Union, Vermont State Employees’ Association, and
the Vermont Council on the Arts, whose compensation for service is not paid
from the State Treasury, or any elected or appointed official unless the official
is actively engaged in and devoting substantially full-time to the conduct of the
business of the official’s public office.
* * *
(iv) For purposes of group hospital-surgical-medical expense
insurance only, the term “employees” may include school employees at the
option of a school employer, as those terms are defined in 16 V.S.A. § 2101.
* * *
(b)(1) For group hospital-surgical-medical expense insurance, the Secretary
of Administration shall:
(A) ensure utilization of a reference-based pricing program for
inpatient and outpatient hospital services at hospitals other than critical access
hospitals; and
(B) limit the annual rate of premium growth to not more than the
percentage change from the previous year in the Consumer Price Index for
medical care in the Northeast region.
VT LEG #379227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.43
2025 Page 4 of 4
(2) On or before March 15 annually, the Secretary shall report to the
General Assembly on the effect of the reference-based pricing program on the
cost of the group hospital-surgical-medical expense insurance for State
employees.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026, with the first required report
under 3 V.S.A. § 631(b)(2) due on or before March 15, 2027.
VT LEG #379227 v.1